Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.062

Annual contribution rate increases—Employer, state, and plan 2 members.

The basic employer and state contribution rates and required plan 2 member contribution rates are changed to reflect the 2003 actuarial valuation and actuarial projections of the 2005 actuarial valuation, both of which incorporate the 2002 actuarial experience study conducted by the office of the state actuary for 1995-2000. This contribution rate schedule departs from the normal biennial process for setting contribution rates by requiring annual increases in rates during the 2005-2007 biennium, and by requiring annual rates to be adopted by the pension funding council for the 2007-2009 biennium. The rates are lower in the 2005-2007 biennium than required by the 2003 actuarial valuation and will be higher in the 2007-2009 biennium than required by the projected 2005 actuarial valuation.

Upon completion of the 2005 actuarial valuation, the pension funding council and the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of the contribution rates for 2007-2008 and 2008-2009 and by September 30, 2006, the pension funding council shall adopt contribution rates to complete the four-year phase-in schedule, adjusted for any material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. This contribution rate schedule also requires a departure from the allocation formula for contributions in RCW 41.45.050, suspension of payments on the unfunded liability in the public employees' retirement system and the teachers' retirement system during the 2005-2007 biennium, and a delay in the recognition of the cost of future gain-sharing benefits until the 2007-2009 biennium.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2005, the following employer contribution rate shall be charged: 2.25 percent for the public employees' retirement system.

(2) Beginning September 1, 2005, the following employer contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 2.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system; and

(b) 2.73 percent for the teachers' retirement system.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, the following member contribution rate shall be charged: 2.25 percent for the public employees' retirement system plan 2.

(4) Beginning September 1, 2005, the following member contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 2.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system plan 2; and

(b) 2.48 percent for the teachers' retirement system plan 2.

(5) The contribution rates in subsections (1) through (4) of this section shall be collected through June 30, 2006, for the public employees' retirement system, and August 31, 2006, for the school employees' retirement system and the teachers' retirement system.

(6) Beginning July 1, 2006, the following employer contribution rate shall be charged: 3.50 percent for the public employees' retirement system.

(7) Beginning September 1, 2006, the following employer contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 3.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system; and

(b) 3.25 percent for the teachers' retirement system.

(8) Beginning July 1, 2006, the following member contribution rate shall be charged: 3.50 percent for the public employees' retirement system plan 2.

(9) Beginning September 1, 2006, the following member contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 3.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system plan 2; and

(b) 3.00 percent for the teachers' retirement system plan 2.

(10) During the 2005 interim, the select committee on pension policy shall study the options available to the legislature for addressing the liability associated with future gain-sharing benefits. These options may include, but shall not be limited to, repealing, delaying, or suspending the gain-sharing provisions in law; making gain-sharing discretionary; or replacing gain-sharing benefits with other benefits such as plan choice, employer defined contributions, retirement eligibility enhancements, and postretirement adjustments. The select committee on pension policy shall report the findings and recommendations of its study to the legislative fiscal committees by no later than December 15, 2005.

[ 2005 c 370 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 370 ss 1, 3, and 6: See note following RCW 41.45.060.